California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(1) Interior signs, advertising either wine or distilled spirits, for use in on-sale retail premises, each of which shall not exceed 630 square inches in size. This limitation on the size of interior signs, advertising either wine or distilled spirits, shall not be applicable to off-sale retail premises.

(2) Interior signs advertising beer in on-sale or off-sale retail premises
 which shall bear conspicuous notice of the beer manufacturer’s name, brand name, trade name, slogans, markings, trademarks, or other symbols commonly associated with and generally used by the beer manufacturer in identifying the beer manufacturer’s name or product, and which may bear graphic or pictorial advertising representations. These signs shall include, but are not limited to, posters, placards, stickers, decals, shelf strips, wall panels, plaques, shadow boxes, mobiles, dummy bottles, bottle toppers, case wrappers, brand-identifying statuettes, tap markers, and table tents. These interior signs advertising beer shall not be deemed of intrinsic or utilitarian value and shall remain the property of the beer wholesaler who authorized and furnished them, unless given or sold to the retail licensee.

(3) Interior signs advertising beer for
 use in on-sale or off-sale retail premises, which are illuminated or mechanized, and which shall principally bear a conspicuous notice of the beer manufacturer’s name, brand name, trade name, slogans, markings, trademarks, or other symbols commonly associated with and generally used by the beer manufacturer in identifying the beer manufacturer’s name or product, and which may bear graphic or pictorial advertising representations. These illuminated or mechanized interior signs advertising beer shall not be deemed of intrinsic or utilitarian value and shall remain the property of the beer wholesaler who authorized and furnished them, unless given or sold to the retail licensee.

(4) Signs or other advertising matter for exterior use at any on-sale or off-sale retail premises as may be permitted by this division and rules of the
 department adopted pursuant thereto.

(b) Interior signs advertising beer that are customized for the retailer shall be sold by the wholesaler at a price not less than current market price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 532, Sec. 3.   (AB 546)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25611.2.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any alcoholic beverage manufacturer, manufacturer’s agent, winegrower, or wholesaler from furnishing or giving electronic data services to a licensed retail premises. For purposes of this section, “electronic data services” are limited to the transmission by telephone line, microwave, or other electronic means of data relating to retailer inventory of the manufacturer’s, winegrower’s, or wholesaler’s brands, monitoring of brand sales performance, electronic invoice transmissions, and electronic funds transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 99, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

25611.3.

A beer wholesaler may sell or rent exterior signs advertising beer for use at any on-sale or off-sale retail premises. Exterior signs include, but are not limited to, signs, inflatables, and banners used to advertise a beer manufacturer’s product. Exterior signs must be sold or rented at not less than cost, as defined in Section 17026. An exterior sign that is customized for a retailer must be sold, and may not be rented.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 395, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25612.

Signs or other advertising matter used in connection with the licensed premises of any retailer of alcoholic beverages shall not be of any obnoxious, gaudy, blatant, or offensive nature and shall in no manner contrary to the rules of the department obstruct the view of the interior of the premises from the street.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25612.5.

(a) This section shall apply to licensees other than a retail on-sale licensee or on-sale beer and wine licensee who is licensed and operates as a bona fide public eating place, as defined in Section 23038, 23038.1, or 23038.2, or as a hotel, motel, or similar lodging establishment, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 25503.16; a winegrowers license; a licensed beer manufacturer, as defined in Section 23357; a retail licensee who concurrently holds an off-sale retail beer and wine license and a beer manufacturer’s license for those same or contiguous premises; and a retail on-sale licensee or on-sale beer and wine licensee who is licensed and operates as a bona fide public eating place, as defined in Section 23038, 23038.1, or 23038.2, or as a hotel, motel, or similar lodging establishment, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 25503.16, a licensed beer manufacturer, as defined in Section 23357, or a winegrowers license, who sells off-sale beer and wine under the on-sale license on those same or contiguous premises.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare to adopt operating standards as set forth in this section for specified retail premises licensed by the department. The standards set forth in this section are state standards that do not preclude the adoption and implementation of more stringent local regulations that are otherwise authorized by law.

(c) Other than as provided in subdivision (a), each retail licensee shall comply with all of the following:

(1) A prominent, permanent sign or signs stating “NO LOITERING IS ALLOWED ON OR IN FRONT OF THESE PREMISES” shall be posted in a place that is clearly visible to patrons of the licensee. The size, format, form, placement, and languages of the sign or signs shall be determined by the department. This paragraph shall apply to a licensee only upon written notice to the licensee from the department. The department shall issue this written notice only upon a request, from the local law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the premises are located, that is supported by substantial evidence that there is loitering adjacent to the premises.

(2) A prominent, permanent sign or signs stating “NO OPEN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTAINERS ARE ALLOWED ON THESE PREMISES” shall be posted in a place that is clearly visible to patrons of the licensee. The size, format, form, placement, and languages of the sign or signs shall be determined by the department. This paragraph shall apply to a licensee only upon written notice to the licensee from the department. The department shall issue this written notice only upon a request, from the local law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the premises are located, that is supported by substantial evidence that there is drinking in public adjacent to the premises.

(3) No alcoholic beverages shall be consumed on the premises of an off-sale retail establishment, and no alcoholic beverages shall be consumed outside the edifice of an on-sale retail establishment.

(4) The exterior of the premises, including adjacent public sidewalks and all parking lots under the control of the licensee, shall be illuminated during all hours of darkness during which the premises are open for business in a manner so that persons standing in those areas at night are identifiable by law enforcement personnel. However, the required illumination shall be placed so as to minimize interference with the quiet enjoyment of nearby residents of their property.

(5) Litter shall be removed daily from the premises, including adjacent public sidewalks and all parking lots under the control of the licensee. These areas shall be swept or cleaned, either mechanically or manually, on a weekly basis to control debris.

(6) Graffiti shall be removed from the premises and all parking lots under the control of the licensee within 72 hours of application. If the graffiti occurs on a Friday or weekend day, or on a holiday, the licensee shall remove the graffiti 72 hours following the beginning of the next weekday.

(7) No more than 33 percent of the square footage of the windows and clear doors of an off-sale premises shall bear advertising or signs of any sort, and all advertising and signage shall be placed and maintained in a manner that ensures that law enforcement personnel have a clear and unobstructed view of the interior of the premises, including the area in which the cash registers are maintained, from the exterior public sidewalk or entrance to the premises. However, this latter requirement shall not apply to premises where there are no windows, or where existing windows are located at a height that precludes a view of the interior of the premises to a person standing outside the premises.

(8) Upon request of the local law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the licensed premises are located or at the discretion of the department, each public telephone located on off-sale premises (or located in an adjacent area under the control of the off-sale licensee) shall be equipped with devices or mechanisms that prevent persons from calling into that public telephone.

(9) Every licensed retailer who sells or rents video recordings of harmful matter, as defined by Section 313 of the Penal Code, shall create an area within his or her business establishment for the placement of video recordings of harmful matter and for any material that advertises the sale or rental of these video recordings. This area shall be labeled “adults only.” The licensed retailer shall make reasonable efforts to arrange the video recordings in this area in such a way that minors may not readily access the video recordings or view the video box covers. The failure to create and label the “adults only” area is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100). The failure to place a video recording or advertisement, regardless of its content, in this area shall not constitute an infraction.

(10) A copy of the applicable operating standards shall be available during normal business hours for viewing by the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 787, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

25613.

Every holder of an on-sale retail license who gives, sells, or otherwise dispenses any draught beer shall, upon the faucet, spigot, or outlet from which the beer is drawn, attach and keep posted a clear and legible notice, placard, or marker which shall in the English language indicate and declare the name or brand adopted by the manufacturer of the draught beer so given, sold, or dispensed by the licensee. If the faucet, spigot, or other drawing device is in a location not within the room of the place of service and consumption of the beer, there shall also be kept posted a similar notice, placard, or marker in the place of service and consumption of the beer which shall truthfully state and indicate only the kinds and brands of draught beer actually on sale in the premises of the on-sale licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

25614.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of Sections 25611 to 25613, inclusive, or substitutes another or different brand of draught beer from that indicated by any of the required notices, placards, or markers, or substitutes one brand of beer for another, or misrepresents the brand or kind of beer served to a consumer is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25616.

Any person who knowingly or willfully files a false license fee report with the department, and any person who refuses to permit the department or any of its representatives to make any inspection or examination for which provision is made in this division, or who fails to keep books of account as prescribed by the department, or who fails to preserve such books for the inspection of the department for such time as the department deems necessary, or who alters, cancels, or obliterates entries in such books of account for the purpose of falsifying the records of sales of alcoholic beverages made under this division is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one month nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 60.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

25617.

Every person convicted for a violation of any of the provisions of this division for which another penalty or punishment is not specifically provided for in this division is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 61.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

25618.

Every person convicted of a felony for a violation of any of the provisions of this division for which another punishment is not specifically provided for in this division shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 30.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

25619.

Every peace officer and every district attorney in this State shall enforce the provisions of this division and shall inform against and diligently prosecute persons whom they have reasonable cause to believe offenders against the provisions of this division. Every such officer refusing or neglecting to do so is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.

(a) Any person possessing any can, bottle, or other receptacle containing any alcoholic beverage that has been opened, or a seal broken, or the contents of which have been partially removed, in any city, county, or city and county owned park or other city, county, or city and county owned public place, or any recreation and park district, or any regional park or open-space district shall be guilty of an infraction if the city, county, or city and county has enacted an ordinance that prohibits the possession of those containers in those areas or the consumption of alcoholic beverages in those areas.

(b) This section does not apply where the possession is within premises located in a park or other public place for which a license has been issued pursuant to this division.

(c) This section does not apply when an individual is in possession of an alcoholic beverage container for the purpose of recycling or other related activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 381, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25621.

(a) No person shall purchase, offer for sale, or use any vaporized form of alcohol produced by an alcohol vaporizing device.

(b) For purposes of this section, “alcohol vaporizing device” means any device, machine, or process that mixes spirits, liquor, or other alcohol product with pure oxygen or other gas to produce a vaporized product for the purpose of consumption by inhalation.

(c) (1) Any person who sells or offers for sale any vaporized form of alcohol produced by an alcohol vaporizing device is guilty of a misdemeanor that shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both.

(2) Any person who purchases or uses any vaporized form of alcohol produced by an alcohol vaporizing device is subject to a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(d) Any person who possesses, sells, or offers for sale any alcohol vaporizing device shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25621.5.

(a) A licensee shall not, at its licensed premises, sell, offer, or provide cannabis or cannabis products, as defined in Section 26001, including an alcoholic beverage that contains cannabis or a cannabis product, and no alcoholic beverage shall be manufactured, sold, or offered for sale if it contains tetrahydrocannabinol or cannabinoids, regardless of source.

(b) The department shall take disciplinary action against a licensee that violates this section, including, but not limited to, suspension
 or revocation of the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   (AB 2914)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25622.

(a) Beer to which caffeine has been directly added as a separate ingredient shall not be imported into this state, produced, manufactured, or distributed within this state, or sold by a licensed retailer within this state.

(b) The department may require licensees to submit product formulas as it determines to be necessary to implement and enforce this section. Any information required to be provided by any licensee to the department pursuant to this section shall be considered confidential and corporate proprietary information. This information shall not be subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of
 the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 39.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

25623.

(a) A person shall not possess, purchase, sell, offer for sale, manufacture, distribute, or use powdered alcohol.

(b) Any person who sells, offers for sale, manufactures, or distributes powdered alcohol is guilty of an infraction that shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 778, Sec. 5.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25623.5.

(a) A person shall not possess, purchase, sell, offer for sale, manufacture, distribute, or use powdered alcohol.

(b) Any person who purchases, possesses, or uses powdered alcohol is guilty of an infraction and subject to a fine of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 742, Sec. 5.   (AB 1554)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25624.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Drug testing devices” means test strips, stickers, straws, and other devices designed to detect the presence of controlled substances in a drink.

(2) “Controlled substances” includes, but is not limited to, flunitrazepam, ketamine, and gamma hydroxybutyric acid, also known by other names, including GHB, gamma hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutanoic acid, sodium oxybate, and sodium oxybutyrate.

(b) An applicant for a new permanent on-sale general public premises (Type 48) license or the holder of an existing Type 48 license shall offer for sale to
 their customers drug testing devices at a cost not to exceed a reasonable amount based on the wholesale cost of those devices.

(c) A licensee subject to subdivision (b) shall post the following notice in a prominent and conspicuous location:

“Don’t get roofied! Drink lids and drink spiking drug test kits available here. Ask a staff member for details.”

(d) This section does not prevent a Type 48 licensee from offering drug testing devices to their customers free of charge.

(e) A Type 48 licensee shall not be held liable for a defective test or inaccurate test result, including, but not limited to, a false positive or false negative test result.

(f) A Type 48 licensee shall ensure that all testing devices offered to customers have not exceeded their expiration date or recommended period of use, according to the product label, product packaging, or otherwise recommended by the manufacturer.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 25617, a violation of this section is not a crime.

(h) The department shall post on its internet website a link to a page that contains information about the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, the signage that is required to be posted and the types of drug testing devices that are required to be available on a Type 48 licensed premises.

(i) This section shall be operative on July 1, 2024, and shall be repealed on January 1,
 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   (AB 2375)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25624.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Drug testing devices” means test strips, stickers, straws, and other devices designed to detect the presence of controlled substances in a drink.

(2) “Drink spiking,” also known as “roofied,” includes, but is not limited to, adding a controlled substance or alcohol to a person’s drink without the knowledge or consent of that person.

(3) “Controlled substances” includes, but is not limited to, flunitrazepam, ketamine, and gamma hydroxybutyric acid, also known by other names,
 including GHB, gamma hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutanoic acid, sodium oxybate, and sodium oxybutyrate.

(b) An applicant for a new permanent on-sale general public premises (Type 48) license or the holder of an existing Type 48 license shall contact and provide any of the following information to law enforcement or emergency medical services when they are notified by a customer that the customer or another customer believes they have been a victim of drink spiking:

(1) A positive test result from a drug testing device.

(2) Observation of someone tampering with a customer’s drink.

(3) Verbal communication to staff that a customer has been drugged.

(4) Observation of symptoms associated with the effects of drink spiking or the controlled substances used for drink spiking. 

(5) Upon contacting law enforcement or emergency medical services, the licensee or a member of the staff shall, to the best of their ability, follow any instructions provided by law enforcement or emergency medical services personnel, and, to the best of their ability, monitor the customer until law enforcement or emergency medical services arrive at the premises to assess the customer.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 25617, a violation of this section is not a crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (AB 2389)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25625.

(a) (1) An applicant for a new permanent on-sale general public premises (Type 48) license or the holder of an existing Type 48 license shall, upon request, provide a lid with a customer’s drink. For purposes of this section, “lid” means a removable cover of any size that attaches to the rim of a beverage. The lid is not required to fit all containers in which alcoholic beverages are served on the premises but shall fit at least one.

(2) A licensee subject to this subdivision shall post the following notice in a prominent and conspicuous location:

“Don’t get roofied! Drink lids and drink spiking drug test kits available here. Ask a staff member for details.”

(b) The licensee may charge an additional fee for providing a lid with a customer’s drink, which shall not exceed a reasonable amount based on the wholesale cost of those lids.

(c) This section does not prevent a Type 48 licensee from offering lids to their customers free of
 charge.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 25617, a violation of this section is not a crime.

(e) A sole violation of this section, including the notice requirement in this section, shall result only in a warning by the department for the first offense.

(f) This section shall
 become operative July 1, 2025, and shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 714, Sec. 2.   (AB 2375)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hours of Sale and Delivery of Alcoholic Beverages [25631. - 25633.]

25631.

Any on- or off-sale licensee, or agent or employee of that licensee, who sells, gives, or delivers to any persons any alcoholic beverage or any person who knowingly purchases any alcoholic beverage between the hours of 2 o’clock a.m. and 6 o’clock a.m. of the same day, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

For the purposes of this section, on the day that a time change occurs from Pacific standard time to Pacific daylight saving time, or back again to Pacific standard time, “2 o’clock a.m.” means two hours after midnight of the day preceding the day such change occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 744, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

25631.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 25631, alcoholic beverage sales may occur between 2 a.m. and 4 a.m. upon the on-sale licensed premises operated in a fully enclosed arena with a seating capacity of at least 18,000 seats located in the City of Inglewood if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The licensee files a request with the governing body of the City of Inglewood for adoption of an ordinance that would allow alcoholic beverage sales to occur between 2 a.m. and 4 a.m. upon the on-sale licensed premises operated in a fully enclosed arena with a seating capacity of at least 18,000 seats located in the City of Inglewood, the governing
 body adopts such an ordinance, and the ordinance is submitted to the department.

(2) Within 30 consecutive days of filing the request pursuant to paragraph (1), the licensee notifies local law enforcement agencies of the request.

(3) The sales occur in an area in the arena no larger than 2,500 square feet, with a maximum capacity of 100 persons.

(4) The on-sale licensed premises are restricted between 2 a.m. and 4 a.m. only to patrons who are 21 years of age or older.

(5) The sales occur in a private area in the arena that is available only to members of a private club who are assessed dues in order to belong to the club and thereby gain access to the area, and guests of those members, when the member is in attendance.

(6) The sales occur in the hours immediately following a day on which a sporting event, concert, or other major event, or a private event not open to the public, has occurred in the arena.

(7) All persons engaged in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages between 2 a.m. and 4 a.m. have successfully completed a Responsible Beverage Service training course pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 25680).

(8) The licensee has a permit issued by the department pursuant to Section 23398.7.

(b) The department may adopt rules as it determines to be necessary for the administration of this section.

(c) The City of Inglewood shall submit a report to the department on the impact of these provisions one year after any licensee is issued a permit from the department pursuant to Section 23398.7 and once annually thereafter. The report shall include information on any impact the additional service hours had on crime rates in the city, including arrests for driving under the influence, and related crimes.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 977, Sec. 2.   (AB 3206)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25632.

Any retail licensee, or agent or employee of such licensee, who permits any alcoholic beverage to be consumed by any person on the licensee’s licensed premises during any hours in which it is unlawful to sell, give, or deliver any alcoholic beverage for consumption on the premises is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25633.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person licensed as a manufacturer, winegrower, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, or wholesaler of any alcoholic beverage shall deliver or cause to be delivered any alcoholic beverage to or for any person holding an on-sale or off-sale license on Sunday or except between the hours of 3 a.m. and 8 p.m. of any day other than Sunday. Any alcoholic beverage may be delivered at the platform of the manufacturing, producing, or distributing plant at any time. Nothing contained in this section prohibits the transportation or the carriage and delivery in transit at any time of any alcoholic beverage between the premises of a manufacturer, winegrower, wholesaler, distiller, importer, or any of them. Every person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.   Effective August 8, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Women and Minors [25657. - 25668.]

25657.

It is unlawful:

(a) For any person to employ, upon any licensed on-sale premises, any person for the purpose of procuring or encouraging the purchase or sale of alcoholic beverages, or to pay any such person a percentage or commission on the sale of alcoholic beverages for procuring or encouraging the purchase or sale of alcoholic beverages on such premises.

(b) In any place of business where alcoholic beverages are sold to be consumed upon the premises, to employ or knowingly permit anyone to loiter in or about said premises for the purpose of begging or soliciting any patron or customer of, or visitor in, such premises to purchase any alcoholic beverages for the one begging or soliciting.

Every person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

25658.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), every person who sells, furnishes, gives, or causes to be sold, furnished, or given away any alcoholic beverage to any person under 21 years of age is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Except as provided in Section 25667 or 25668, any person under 21 years of age who purchases any alcoholic beverage, or any person under 21 years of age who consumes any alcoholic beverage in any on-sale premises, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Any person who violates subdivision (a) by purchasing any alcoholic beverage for, or furnishing, giving, or giving away any alcoholic beverage to, a person under 21 years of age, and the person under 21 years of age thereafter
 consumes the alcohol and thereby proximately causes great bodily injury or death to themselves or any other person, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) Any on-sale licensee who knowingly permits a person under 21 years of age to consume any alcoholic beverage in the on-sale premises, whether or not the licensee has knowledge that the person is under 21 years of age, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) or (3), or Section 25667 or 25668, any person who violates this section shall be punished by a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), no part of which shall be suspended, or the person shall be required to perform not less than 24 hours or more than 32 hours of community service during hours when the person is not employed and is not attending school, or a combination of a fine and community service as determined by
 the court. A second or subsequent violation of subdivision (b), where prosecution of the previous violation was not barred pursuant to Section 25667 or 25668, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or the person shall be required to perform not less than 36 hours or more than 48 hours of community service during hours when the person is not employed and is not attending school, or a combination of a fine and community service as determined by the court. It is the intent of the Legislature that the community service requirements prescribed in this section require service at an alcohol or drug treatment program or facility or at a county coroner’s office, if available, in the area where the violation occurred or where the person resides.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), any person who violates subdivision (a) by furnishing an alcoholic beverage, or causing an alcoholic beverage to be furnished, to a
 minor shall be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), no part of which shall be suspended, and the person shall be required to perform not less than 24 hours of community service during hours when the person is not employed and is not attending school.

(3) Any person who violates subdivision (c) shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for a minimum term of six months not to exceed one year, by a fine of three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by both imprisonment and fine.

(f) Persons under 21 years of age may be used by peace officers in the enforcement of this section to apprehend licensees, or employees or agents of licensees, or other persons who sell or furnish alcoholic beverages to minors. Notwithstanding subdivision (b), any person under 21 years of age who purchases or attempts to purchase any alcoholic beverage while under the direction of a peace officer is immune from prosecution for that purchase or attempt to purchase an alcoholic beverage. Guidelines with respect to the use of persons under 21 years of age as decoys shall be adopted and published by the department in accordance with the rulemaking portion of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Law enforcement-initiated minor decoy programs in operation prior to the effective date of regulatory guidelines adopted by the department shall be authorized as long as the minor decoy displays to the seller
 of alcoholic beverages the appearance of a person under 21 years of age. This subdivision shall not be construed to prevent the department from taking disciplinary action against a licensee who sells alcoholic beverages to a minor decoy prior to the department’s final adoption of regulatory guidelines. After the completion of every minor decoy program performed under this subdivision, the law enforcement agency using the decoy shall notify licensees within 72 hours of the results of the program. When the use of a minor decoy results in the issuance of a citation, the notification required shall be given to licensees and the department within 72 hours of the issuance of the citation. A law enforcement agency may comply with this requirement by leaving a written notice at the licensed premises addressed to the licensee, or by mailing a notice addressed to the licensee.

(g) The penalties imposed by this section do not preclude prosecution or the
 imposition of penalties under any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, Section 272 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 613, Sec. 3.   (SB 498)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25658.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, no licensee may petition the department for an offer in compromise pursuant to Section 23095 for a third or any subsequent violation of Section 25658 that occurs within 36 months of the initial violation.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 24200, the department may revoke a license for a third violation of Section 25658 that occurs within any 36-month period. This provision shall not be construed to limit the department’s authority and discretion to revoke a license prior to a third violation when the circumstances warrant that penalty.

(c) For purposes of this section, no violation may be considered for purposes of determination of the penalty until it has become final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 8.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25658.2.

(a) A parent or legal guardian who knowingly permits his or her child, or a person in the company of the child, or both, who are under the age of 18 years, to consume an alcoholic beverage or use a controlled substance at the home of the parent or legal guardian is guilty of misdemeanor if all of the following occur:

(1) As the result of the consumption of an alcoholic beverage or use of a controlled substance at the home of the parent or legal guardian, the child or other underage person has a blood-alcohol concentration of 0.05 percent or greater, as measured by a chemical test, or is under the influence of a controlled substance.

(2) The parent knowingly permits that child or other underage person, after leaving the parent’s or legal guardian’s home, to drive a vehicle.

(3) That child or underage person is found to have caused a traffic collision while driving the vehicle.

(b) A person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not to exceed one year, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both imprisonment and fine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 625, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25658.4.

(a) No clerk shall make an off sale of alcoholic beverages unless the clerk executes under penalty of perjury on the first day of that sale an application and acknowledgment. The application and acknowledgment shall be in a form understandable to the clerk.

(1) The department shall specify the form of the application and acknowledgment, which shall include at a minimum a summary of this division pertaining to the following:

(A) The prohibitions contained in Sections 25658 and 25658.5 pertaining to the sale to, and purchase of, alcoholic beverages by persons under 21 years of age.

(B) Bona fide evidence of majority as provided in Section
 25660.

(C) Hours of operation as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 25631).

(D) The prohibitions contained in subdivision (a) of Section 25602 and Section 25602.1 pertaining to sales to an intoxicated person.

(E) Sections 23393 and 23394 as they pertain to on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages in an off-sale premises.

(F) The requirements and prohibitions contained in Section 25659.5 pertaining to sales of keg beer for consumption off licensed premises.

(2) The application and acknowledgment shall also include a statement that the clerk has read and understands the summary, a statement that the clerk has never been convicted of violating this division or, if convicted,
 an explanation of the circumstances of each conviction, and a statement that the application and acknowledgment is executed under penalty of perjury.
